Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EVERY MEAL.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to Every Meal to provide children and families experiencing food insecurity with access to nutritious and culturally appropriate food over the weekend. new text end